Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB423.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 30 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 2707.3. Volunteer firefighters, volunteer special fire police officers and volunteer emergency medical service technicians.(a) Eligibility.--The commission or a county treasurer shall issue one annual resident fishing license at a cost of $1 to any person eligible for the license under section 2701 (relating to resident fishing licenses) who provides documentation that for at least the previous 12 months the person has been a volunteer firefighter, volunteer special fire police officer or volunteer 1234567891011121314151617181920 emergency medical service technician in good standing in this Commonwealth.(b) Regulations.--The commission may promulgate regulations to implement this section.Section 2. Section 2706 of Title 34 is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 2706. Resident license and fee exemptions.* * *(i) Volunteer firefighter, volunteer special fire police officer and volunteer emergency medical service technician hunting licenses.--(1) Volunteer firefighter, volunteer special fire police officer and volunteer emergency medical service technician hunting licenses shall be issued by the commission, county treasurer or issuing agent to any person otherwise eligible for a resident hunting license in this Commonwealth who provides documentation that for at least the previous 12 months the person was a volunteer firefighter, volunteer special fire police officer or volunteer emergency medical service technician in good standing in this Commonwealth.(2) The commission may promulgate regulations to implement this subsection.Section 3. Section 2709(a)(2) of Title 34 is amended by adding subparagraphs to read:§ 2709. License costs and fees.(a) License costs.--Any person who qualifies under the provisions of this chapter shall be issued the applicable license upon payment of the following costs and the issuing agent's fee:* * *20250SB0423PN0360 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) * * *(vii) Volunteer firefighter hunting - $1.(viii) Volunteer special fire police officer hunting - $1.(ix) Volunteer emergency medical service technician hunting - $1.* * *Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0423PN0360 - 3 - 12345678